Hawaii statutes.
§578-14 Record of adoption. (a) A
certified copy of the decree of adoption, or a certified abstract thereof on a
form approved by the department of health, after the decree has become
effective, shall be sent to the department. The department shall cause to be
made a new record of the birth in the name of the individual, as fixed or
changed by the decree, with the names of the adoptive parents and, upon request
of both adoptive parents, or the sole adoptive parent if there is only one,
that the name or names of either or both of the natural parents appear on the
certificate, with the name of a natural parent who consents to be named on the
certificate.

(b) If a new birth certificate is issued, the
original birth certificate shall be sealed and filed with the decree or the
abstract thereof, and the sealed package shall be opened only as provided in
section 578-15(b).

(c) If the birth of the individual occurred
outside of the State and a record of birth exists, the certified copy of the
decree or the abstract thereof, shall be transmitted by the department of
health to the birth registration authorities of the place of the individual's
birth with a request that those authorities take appropriate action with
respect to the record of the individual's birth. If the birth of the
individual occurred outside of the State, or if the birth of an individual born
in the State has not been registered with the department of health, or if other
good cause exists, the clerk of the court, upon request, and with the approval
of the family court, upon the finding of the court that the action is for the
best interests of the individual involved, shall furnish to the adoptive
parents, or to the individual, or to any proper person acting in their behalf,
a certified copy or abstract of the decree of adoption or a certificate of
adoption in a form approved by the court. If the parental rights of a parent
or the parents of a minor child have been judicially terminated under chapter
571 prior to the entry of the decree, a certified copy of the decree shall be
filed in the termination proceeding. [L 1945, c 40, pt of §2; am L 1947, c 47,
§3; am L 1949, c 328, §1; am L 1953, c 115, pt of §1; RL 1955, §331-14; am L Sp
1959 2d, c 1, §19; HRS §578-14; am L 1973, c 211, §3(l); am L 1976, c 194,
§1(8); am L 1980, c 153, §7; am L 1990, c 338, §4]

Cross References

Records and documents, see §338-20.

Rules of Court

New birth certificates, see HFCR rule 112.

Law Journals and Reviews

Privacy v. Secrecy: The Open Adoption Records Movement and
Its Impact on Hawai‘i. 15 UH L. Rev. 483.

Case Notes

Agreement of adoption not recorded, of no validity. 7 H.
273.

Provision for new record cited. 49 H. 273, 276, 283, 414
P.2d 925.

Cited: 45 H. 69, 80, 361 P.2d 1054.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next